Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1-171.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-171.1. Street-legal utility vehicle.
A. A "street-legal utility vehicle" is any motor vehicle
having:
1. A bench seat or side-by-side seat for the use of each rider;
2. Four wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding a
tractor;
3. A combustion engine with a piston or rotor displacement of
four hundred cubic centimeters (400 cc) or greater and capable of
maintaining speeds of forty-five (45) fifty (50) miles per hour or
greater;

4. For each occupant, safety belts or safety shoulder harnesses
which shall be of a type and shall be installed pursuant to 49
C.F.R., Section 571.208 et seq.; and
5. All equipment required by the provisions of Sections 12-201
through 12-232 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, with
respect to equipment on vehicles.
B. A street-legal utility vehicle operated on the streets and
highways of this state shall be registered as a motor vehicle.
C. The operator of a street-legal utility vehicle shall not be
required to have an "M" endorsement on the Class D license pursuant
to Section 6-110.1 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
The operator shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age and hold a
valid Oklahoma driver license.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-1116, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-1116. A. The self-propelled or motor-driven and
operated vehicles described in this section shall be prohibited from
operating or shall be limited in operation on the streets and
highways of this state.
B. Self-propelled or motor-driven cycles, known and commonly
referred to as "minibikes" and other similar trade names, shall be
prohibited from operating on the streets and highways of this state,
except:
1. When used in a parade; or
2. When registered, as required by subsection E of Section 1151
of this title, and operated in this state by food vendor services
upon streets having a speed limit of thirty (30) miles per hour or
less.
All minibikes offered for sale in this state shall bear the
following notice to the customer: "This machine is not manufactured
or sold for operation on the public streets or highways. Since it
is not provided with equipment required by law for street or highway
use, all persons are cautioned that any operation of this vehicle
upon a public street or highway will be in violation of the motor
vehicle laws of this state and will subject the violator to arrest."
ENR. H. B. NO. 1419 Page 2

C. Golf carts and utility vehicles, as defined by Section 1102
of this title, shall not be operated on the streets and highways of
this state except:
1. Golf carts or utility vehicles owned by the Oklahoma Tourism
and Recreation Department, and operated by employees or agents of
the Department or employees of independent management companies
working on behalf of the Department, may be operated on the streets
and highways of this state during daylight hours or under rules
developed by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission, when
the streets and highways are located within the boundaries of a
state park. The Department shall have warning signs placed at the
entrance and other locations at those state parks allowing golf
carts or utility vehicles to be operated on the streets and highways
of this state located within the boundaries of those state parks.
The warning signs shall state that golf carts and utility vehicles
may be operating on streets and highways and that motor vehicle
operators shall take special precautions to be alert for the
presence of golf carts or utility vehicles on the streets and
highways;
2. The municipal governing body has adopted an ordinance
governing the operation of golf carts and/or or utility vehicles on
city streets; provided, such ordinances shall include necessary
vehicle lighting and safety requirements;
3. Golf carts or utility vehicles may operate on state highways
only if making a perpendicular crossing of a state highway located
within the boundaries of a municipality which has adopted an
ordinance governing the operation of golf carts and/or or utility
vehicles;
4. The board of county commissioners of a county has approved
the operation of golf cart and/or or utility vehicle traffic on
roadways within the county, and:
a. the roadway has a posted speed limit of twenty-five
(25) miles per hour or less,
b. the roadway is located in an unincorporated area, and
c. appropriate signage, cautioning motorists of the
possibility of golf cart or utility vehicle traffic,
is erected by the board of county commissioners; or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1419 Page 3

5. Street-legal utility vehicles that are registered as a motor
vehicle pursuant to subsection B of Section 1 1-171.1 of this act
title may be operated on the streets and highways of this state and
U.S. highways in counties whose population is less than seventy-five
thousand (75,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census.
Registered street-legal utility vehicles may be operated on
stretches of U.S. highways with posted speed limits of fifty (50)
miles per hour or less in counties with a population of more than
seventy-five thousand (75,000) according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census. Provided, however, street-legal utility vehicles
shall not be operated on the National System of Interstate and
Defense Highways or U.S. highways.
D. All-terrain vehicles shall not be operated on the streets
and highways of this state, except:
1. On unpaved roads which are located within the boundaries of
any property of the Forest Service of the United States Department
of Agriculture;
2. On highways if:
a. the vehicle needs to make a direct crossing of the
highway while the vehicle is traveling upon a
regularly traveled trail and needs to continue travel
from one area of the trail to another and, if the
vehicle comes to a complete stop, yields the right-of-
way to all oncoming traffic that constitutes an
immediate hazard, and crosses the highway at an angle
of approximately ninety (90) degrees to the direction
of the street or highway. This exception shall not
apply to divided highways or highways with a posted
speed limit of more than thirty-five (35) miles per
hour in the area of the crossing,
b. the vehicle needs to travel on a highway in order to
cross a railroad track. In that event, the all-
terrain vehicle may travel for not more than three
hundred (300) feet on a highway to cross a railroad
track,
c. the operator of the all-terrain vehicle making the
crossing at a highway has a valid driver license, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1419 Page 4

d. the operator of the vehicle makes a crossing on a
highway during daylight hours only;
3. On streets and highways within a municipality if the
municipal governing body has adopted an ordinance governing the
operation of golf carts, utility vehicles or all-terrain vehicles on
streets and highways within the municipality; or
4. On roadways within unincorporated areas of a county if those
roadways are not part of the state highway system or the National
System of Interstate and Defense Highways; provided, however, that
the driver is a licensed driver.
E. Mopeds, as defined by Section 1-133.2 of this title, may be
operated on the streets and highways of this state if:
1. The municipal governing body has adopted an ordinance
governing the operation of mopeds on city streets; provided, such
ordinances shall include necessary vehicle lighting and safety
requirements; or
2. The board of county commissioners of a county has approved
the operation of mopeds on roadways within the county, not including
roadways within a municipality.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1419 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1419 Page 6